Maryland, session 2026, HB0889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–324.
(D) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF WICOMICO COUNTY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN WICOMICO COUNTY MAY
GRANT, BY LAW, A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON REAL PROPERTY THAT IS:
(I) OWNED BY SALISBURY NEIGHBORHOOD HOUSING
SERVICES, INC., WITH THE INTENTION OF RELINQUISHING OWNERSHIP IN THE NEAR
FUTURE;
(II) USED FOR THE PURPOSES OF DEVELOPMENT,
REHABILITATION, AND TRANSFER TO A PRIVATE OWNER; AND
(III) NOT OCCUPIED BY ADMINISTRATIVE OR WAREHOUSE
BUILDINGS OWNED BY SALISBURY NEIGHBORHOOD HOUSING SERVICES, INC.
– 1 –

Ch. 711 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) IF THE GOVERNING BODY OF WICOMICO COUNTY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN WICOMICO COUNTY GRANTS
A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, SALISBURY NEIGHBORHOOD
HOUSING SERVICES, INC., SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL WRITTEN REPORT TO THE
GOVERNING BODY THAT DOCUMENTS THE FOLLOWING:
(I) ALL REAL PROPERTY HOLDINGS OF SALISBURY
NEIGHBORHOOD HOUSING SERVICES, INC., IN THE JURISDICTION GRANTING THE
TAX CREDIT; AND
(II) ALL TRANSACTIONS INVOLVING REAL PROPERTY HOLDINGS
OF SALISBURY NEIGHBORHOOD HOUSING SERVICES, INC., IN THE JURISDICTION
GRANTING THE TAX CREDIT.
(3) THE GOVERNING BODY OF WICOMICO COUNTY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN WICOMICO COUNTY MAY
PROVIDE, BY LAW, FOR:
(I) THE AMOUNT, TERMS, SCOPE, AND DURATION OF THE TAX
CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –